Utah statutes.
26-1-16.   Executive director -- Power to accept funds and gifts.

The executive director may accept and receive such other funds and gifts as may be made available from private and public groups for the purposes of promoting and protecting the public health or for the provision of health services to the people of the state and shall expend the same as appropriated by the legislature.

